src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

miä:mi PersSg1  "" ;
siä:si PersSg2  "" ;
hää:hä PersSg3  "" ;
möö:m PersPl1  "" ;
töö:t PersPl2  "" ;
höö:h PersPl3  "" ;
se:s Dem-se  "" ;
neet:n Dem-neet  "" ;
nämä:nä Dem-nämä  "" ;
tämä:tä Dem-tämä  "" ;
kumpa:kumpa Pron-kumpa  "" ;
mikä:mi PronInterr-mikä  "" ;
kus:ku PronInterr-kus  "" ;
